Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.258

Service agent—Registration certificate.

(1) Except as authorized by the department, a service agent must be certified by the department before providing services to place a weighing or measuring instrument or device to be placed into commercial use under RCW 19.94.255(3). This registration requirement does not apply to the department or a city sealer.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 19.94.2584, a service agent registration certificate is valid for one year unless the department specifies a longer period by rule. The certificate may be renewed by submitting a renewal application to the department.

[ 2019 c 96 s 7; 2000 c 171 s 61; 1995 c 355 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.